New York, session 2025-2026, S5655.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 757 of the general business law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. A provision, covenant, clause or understanding in, collateral to or 4 affecting a construction contract requiring retainage as expressly 5 provided for by section seven hundred fifty-six-c of this article in an 6 amount exceeding five percent of the contract sum. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09177-01-5